Louisiana, session 2026, SB338.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:416.14(D)(3)(e) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§416.14. Bullying; definition; prohibition; notice; reporting; accountability
* * *
D. The State Board of Elementary and Secondary Education, in collaboration
with the state Department of Education, shall develop and adopt rules and
regulations to implement the provisions of this Section relative to the procedures and
processes to be used to report and investigate bullying and which shall include but
not be limited to:
* * *
(3) Investigation procedure. The State Board of Elementary and Secondary
Education shall develop and adopt a procedure for the investigation of reports of
bullying of a student by another student. The procedure shall include the following:
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-611 REENGROSSED
SB NO. 338
* * *
(e)(i) Disciplinary action. If the school has received a report of bullying, has
determined that an act of bullying has occurred, and after meeting with the parent or
legal guardian of the students involved, the school official shall:
(i)(aa) Take prompt and appropriate disciplinary action against the student
that the school official determines has engaged in conduct which constitutes
bullying, if appropriate.
(ii)(bb) Report criminal conduct to law enforcement, if appropriate.
(cc) Require that the student and his parent participate in a court-
approved decisionmaking course necessary for the student's conduct.
(ii) If the school has received a report of bullying, has determined that
an act of bullying has occurred, and after meeting with the parent or legal
guardian of the students involved, the school official may require the parent or
legal guardian of the student involved to attend school with the student for one
week upon return of the student to school.
* * *